Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 708A.430 is amended to read:
708A.430. (1) On the death of a depositor of an insured  institution, if the deposit is $25,000 or
less, the insured institution, after receiving an affidavit as provided  in subsection [ (2)] (3) of this
section from a person that claims the deposit, or a declaration from the Department of Human
Services or the Oregon Health Authority as  provided in subsection (4) of this section,  may
pay the moneys on deposit to the credit of the deceased depositor, in the following order  of priority,
to:
(a) The surviving spouse at the surviving spouse’s demand at  any time after the depositor’s
death;
(b) The  Oregon Health Authority or the Department of Human Services, if the authority or the
department demands the payment not less than 46  days and no more than 75 days [ from] after the
death of the depositor if the depositor  does not have a surviving spouse and if the authority or de-
partment has a preferred claim under ORS 411.708, 411.795 or 416.350;
(c) The depositor’s surviving children 18 years of age or older, if the depositor does not have  a
surviving spouse and the authority and department do not have a claim;
(d) The depositor’s surviving parent, if the depositor does not have a surviving  spouse or sur-
viving child 18 years of age or older and if the authority and department do not have a claim; or
(e) The depositor’s surviving brothers and sisters 18 years of age or older, if  the depositor does
not have a surviving  spouse, surviving child 18 years of age or older or surviving parent and the
authority and department do not have a claim.
(2)(a) An insured institution may not pay moneys on deposit under  subsection (1)(c), (d)
or (e) of this section earlier than 46 days after the death of the depositor.
(b) An insured institution may not pay moneys on deposit under subsection  (1)(c), (d) or
(e) of this section earlier than 76 days after  the death of the depositor unless the financial
institution obtains prior verbal  or written authorization from the Oregon Health Authority
or its designated representative and the Department of Human Services  or its designated
representative.
[(2)] (3) [ The affidavit ] An affidavit or declaration submitted under this section  must:
(a) State where and when the depositor died;
(b) State that the total deposits of the deceased depositor in all  financial institutions in Oregon
do not exceed $25,000;
Enrolled House Bill 2346 (HB 2346-A) Page 1
(c) Show the relationship of the affiant or declarant to the deceased depositor; and
(d) Embody a promise to pay the expenses of last sickness, funeral  expenses and just debts of
the deceased depositor out of the deposit to the full extent of the deposit if necessary, in the  order
of priority  prescribed by ORS 115.125, and to distribute any remaining moneys to the persons that
are entitled to the moneys by law.
(4) An insured institution shall accept from the  Department of Human Services or the
Oregon Health Authority, without additional requirements, a declaration under penalty of
perjury meeting the requirements of subsection (3) of this section. A  declaration submitted
under this section must be signed by the  declarant and must include the following sentence
immediately above the signature line of  the declarant: “I hereby declare under penalty of
perjury that I am authorized by the  Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health
Authority to make this declaration, that the above statement is  true to the best of my
knowledge and belief, and that I understand that it is subject to penalty for perjury.”
[(3)] (5) In the event the depositor died intestate without known heirs, an estate administrator
of the Department of State Lands appointed  under ORS 113.235 is the affiant and shall receive the
moneys as escheat property.
[(4)] (6) The insured institution  shall determine the relationship of the affiant or declarant to
the deceased depositor, but paying the moneys in good faith to the  affiant or declarant discharges
and releases the insured institution from  any liability or responsibility for the transfer in the same
manner and with the same effect as if the insured  institution transferred, delivered or paid the
moneys to a personal representative of the estate of the deceased depositor.
[(5)] (7) A probate proceeding is not necessary  to establish the right of the surviving spouse,
Oregon Health Authority, Department  of Human Services , surviving child, surviving parent, sur-
viving brothers and sisters or an estate administrator of the  Department of State Lands to withdraw
the deposits after filing the affidavit  or declaration . If a  personal representative is appointed in an
estate where a withdrawal of deposits was made under this section,  the person that withdraws the
deposits shall account for the deposits to the personal representative.
[(6)] (8) If an insured institution transfers moneys under subsection (1) of this section,  the in-
sured institution may require the transferee to furnish the insured institution  with a written
indemnity agreement that indemnifies the insured institution against  loss for moneys the insured
institution transferred to the extent of the amount of the deposit.
(9)(a) Moneys disbursed to the  Department of Human Services under subsection (1) of
this section may be made payable only to the department.
(b) Moneys disbursed to the Oregon Health Authority under subsection (1) of  this section
may be made payable only to the authority.
[(7)] (10) This section is subject to the rights of other parties in the account under ORS 708A.455
to 708A.515.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 723.466 is amended to read:
723.466. (1) On the death of a member of a credit union, if the deposit to  the credit of the de-
ceased member is $25,000 or less, the credit union may, upon receipt of an affidavit from [ the] a
person claiming the deposit as provided in subsection  [(2)] (3) of this section, or a declaration from
the Department  of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority as provided in subsection
(4) of this section, pay the moneys on deposit:
(a) To the surviving  spouse on demand of the surviving spouse at any time after the death of
the member;
(b) If there is no surviving spouse, to the Oregon Health Authority  or the Department of Human
Services, on demand of the authority or the department no less than 46 days and no  more than 75
days [ from] after the death of the member when there is a preferred claim arising under ORS
411.708, 411.795 or 416.350;
(c) If there is no  surviving spouse and no authority or department claim, to the member’s sur-
viving children 18 years of age or older;
Enrolled House Bill 2346 (HB 2346-A) Page 2
(d) If there is no surviving spouse, authority claim, department claim or  surviving child 18 years
of age or older, to the member’s surviving parents; or
(e) If there is no  surviving spouse, authority claim, department claim, surviving child 18 years
of age or older or surviving parent, to the member’s  surviving brothers and sisters 18 years of age
or older.
(2)(a) A credit  union may not pay moneys on deposit under subsection (1)(c), (d) or (e)
of this section earlier than 46 days after the death of the depositor.
(b) A credit union  may not pay moneys on deposit under subsection (1)(c), (d) or (e) of
this section earlier than 76 days after the death of the depositor  unless the financial insti-
tution obtains prior  verbal or written authorization from the Oregon Health Authority or its
designated representative and the Department of Human Services or  its designated repre-
sentative.
[(2)] (3) [ The affidavit shall ] An affidavit or declaration submitted under this section must :
(a) State where and when the member died;
(b) State  that the total deposits of the deceased member in all financial institutions in this state
do not exceed $25,000;
(c) Show the relationship of the affiant or declarant to the deceased member; and
(d) Embody a promise to pay the expenses of last sickness, funeral  expenses and just debts of
the deceased member out of  the deposit, to the full extent of the deposit if necessary, in the order
of priority  prescribed by ORS 115.125, and to distribute any remaining moneys to the persons who
are entitled to those moneys by law.
(4) A credit union shall accept from the Department of Human Services or the Oregon
Health Authority, without additional requirements, a declaration under penalty of  perjury
meeting the requirements of subsection (3) of this section. A declaration  submitted under
this section must be signed  by the declarant and must include the following sentence im-
mediately above the signature  line of the declarant: “I hereby declare under penalty of per-
jury that  I am authorized by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health
Authority to make this declaration, that the above statement is  true to the best of my
knowledge and belief, and that I understand that it is subject to penalty for perjury.”
[(3)] (5) In the event the member died  intestate without known heirs, an estate administrator
of the Department of State Lands appointed under ORS 113.235 shall  be the affiant and shall receive
the moneys as escheat property.
[(4)] (6) The credit union shall determine the relationship of  the affiant or declarant  to the
deceased member. However,  payment of the moneys in good faith to the affiant or declarant  dis-
charges and releases the transferor from any liability or responsibility for  the transfer in the same
manner and with the same  effect as if the property had been transferred, delivered or paid to a
personal representative of the estate of the deceased member.
[(5)] (7) A probate proceeding is not necessary to  establish the right of the surviving spouse,
Oregon Health  Authority, Department of Human Services, surviving children,  surviving parents,
surviving brothers and  sisters or an estate administrator of the Department of State Lands to
withdraw the deposits upon the filing of the affidavit  or declaration . If  a personal representative
is appointed in an estate where a withdrawal of  deposits was made under this section, the person
withdrawing the deposits shall account for them to the personal representative.
[(6)] (8) When  a credit union transfers moneys under subsection (1) of this section, the transferor
may require the transferee to furnish the transferor with  a written indemnity agreement, indem-
nifying the transferor against loss for moneys paid to the extent of the amount of the deposit.
(9)(a) Moneys disbursed to the Department of Human Services  under subsection (1) of
this section may be made payable only to the department.
(b) Moneys disbursed to the Oregon Health Authority under subsection (1) of  this section
may be made payable only to the authority.
[(7)] (10) This section is subject to  the rights of other parties to the account under ORS 723.474
to 723.498.
Enrolled House Bill 2346 (HB 2346-A) Page 3
SECTION 3.  ORS 192.589 is amended to read:
192.589. (1) At any time after an individual  dies, the Department of Human Services or the
Oregon Health Authority may deliver to a financial institution the written notice and request de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A written notice and request under this section must:
(a) Include the name, last known address and Social Security number of  the deceased individual;
(b) State the date of the deceased individual’s death;
(c) State that the deceased individual received public assistance or medical assistance that  was
subject to a claim for reimbursement under ORS 411.640, 411.708, 411.795 or 416.350; and
(d) Request that the financial institution provide all or any part of the following information  to
the department or the authority:
(A) Whether the financial institution held on the date of the deceased individual’s death any
deposit account in the  deceased individual’s name or in more than one name, one of which is the
deceased individual’s name;
(B) The balance on deposit in each  deposit account described in subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph on the date of the deceased individual’s death;
(C) The name of each person  to whom the financial institution disbursed funds from a deposit
account described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph on or after the date of the deceased
individual’s death, if the financial institution closed the deposit account on or  after the date of the
deceased individual’s death;
(D) A record of the activity in each of the deposit accounts described in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph in the period that begins 30 days before the date of the  deceased individual’s death and
ends on the date of the deceased individual’s death;
(E) A copy of  any affidavit or declaration the financial institution received under ORS 708A.430
or 723.466; and
(F) The name and address of any person named as an owner of a deposit account described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, if the financial institution has the information in the  financial
institution’s records.
(3) The department or  the authority may submit an affidavit  or declaration under ORS 708A.430
or 723.466 at the same time the department or authority submits a notice and  request under sub-
section (2) of this section.
(4) The department and the authority shall reimburse a  financial institution as provided in ORS
192.602 for  all reasonable costs and expenses the financial institution incurs to provide information
in response to a notice and request under subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 711.577 is amended to read:
711.577. (1) Any  person who would be entitled to withdraw a deposit under ORS 708A.430 may
claim the deposit and receive dividends thereon, or  if claim has been made it may be amended after
the death of the claimant so that future dividends are paid to the  person entitled thereto under ORS
708A.430.
(2) If any claim is more than $500, dividends may be paid  to the person entitled thereto, as
provided in ORS 708A.430, if the Director of the Department of Consumer  and Business Services is
satisfied that the total dividends to be paid after the death of the claimant are less than $100.
(3) The director is under no obligation to determine the relationship  of the affiants or
declarants to the deceased depositor and the payment of dividends made in good faith  to parties
making the affidavit or declaration shall be a release of the director for the amount of the divi-
dends so paid.
Enrolled House Bill 2346 (HB 2346-A) Page 4
Passed by House April 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2346 (HB 2346-A) Page 5